New York, session 2025-2026, A6427.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clause 42 of subparagraph (i) of the opening paragraph of 2 section 1210 of the tax law, as amended by chapter 272 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (42) the county of Westchester is hereby further authorized and 5 empowered to adopt and amend local laws, ordinances or resolutions 6 imposing such taxes at a rate that is one percent additional to the 7 three percent rate authorized above in this paragraph for such county 8 for the period beginning August first, two thousand nineteen and ending 9 November thirtieth, two thousand [twenty-five] twenty-seven; 10 § 2. Subdivision e of section 4 and sections 5, 7 and 16 of chapter 11 272 of the laws of 1991, amending the tax law relating to the method of 12 disposition of sales and compensating use tax revenue in Westchester 13 county and enacting the Westchester county spending limitation act, as 14 amended by chapter 272 of the laws of 2023, are amended to read as 15 follows: 16 e. "Spending limitation" means the maximum amount of county spending 17 established in county fiscal years 1992, 1993, 1994, 1995, 1996, 1997, 18 1998, 1999, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10282-01-5 A. 6427 2 1 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2 2022, 2023, 2024 [and], 2025, 2026 and 2027. 3 § 5. Establishment of annual spending limitation. a. For county fiscal 4 years 1992, 1993, 1994, 1995, 1996, 1997, 1998, 1999, 2000, 2001, 2002, 5 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 6 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024 [and], 2025, 7 2026 and 2027 there shall be in effect an annual spending limitation. 8 The spending limitation shall be derived from a fixed percentage 9 reflecting the ratio of base year spending to county personal income. 10 County personal income for such calculation shall be for the period 11 January 1, 1986 through December 31, 1986. Such percentage shall be 12 applied to county personal income for the period January 1, 1989 through 13 December 31, 1989, to determine the spending limitation for county 14 fiscal year 1992; to determine the spending limitation for county fiscal 15 year 1993, such percentage shall be applied to county personal income 16 for the period January 1, 1990 through December 31, 1990; to determine 17 the spending limitation for county fiscal year 1994, such percentage 18 shall be applied to county personal income for the period January 1, 19 1991 through December 31, 1991; to determine the spending limitation for 20 county fiscal year 1995, such percentage shall be applied to county 21 personal income for the period January 1, 1992 through December 31, 22 1992; to determine the spending limitation for county fiscal year 1996, 23 such percentage shall be applied to county personal income for the peri- 24 od January 1, 1993 through December 31, 1993; to determine the spending 25 limitation for county fiscal year 1997, such percentage shall be applied 26 to county personal income for the period January 1, 1994 through Decem- 27 ber 31, 1994; to determine the spending limitation for county fiscal 28 year 1998, such percentage shall be applied to county personal income 29 for the period January 1, 1995 through December 31, 1995; to determine 30 the spending limitation for county fiscal year 1999, such percentage 31 shall be applied to county personal income for the period January 1, 32 1996 through December 31, 1996; to determine the spending limitation for 33 county fiscal year 2000, such percentage shall be applied to county 34 personal income for the period January 1, 1997 through December 31, 35 1997; to determine the spending limitation for county fiscal year 2001, 36 such percentage shall be applied to county personal income for the peri- 37 od January 1, 1998 through December 31, 1998; to determine the spending 38 limitation for county fiscal year 2002, such percentage shall be applied 39 to county personal income for the period January 1, 1999 through Decem- 40 ber 31, 1999; to determine the spending limitation for county fiscal 41 year 2003, such percentage shall be applied to county personal income 42 for the period January 1, 2000 through December 31, 2000; to determine 43 the spending limitation for county fiscal year 2004, such percentage 44 shall be applied to county personal income for the period January 1, 45 2001 through December 31, 2001; to determine the spending limitation for 46 county fiscal year 2005, such percentage shall be applied to county 47 personal income for the period January 1, 2002 through December 31, 48 2002; to determine the spending limitation for county fiscal year 2006, 49 such percentage shall be applied to county personal income for the peri- 50 od January 1, 2003 through December 31, 2003; to determine the spending 51 limitation for the county fiscal year 2007, such percentage shall be 52 applied to county personal income for the period January 1, 2004 through 53 December 31, 2004; to determine the spending limitation for the county 54 fiscal year 2008, such percentage shall be applied to county personal 55 income for the period January 1, 2005 through December 31, 2005; to 56 determine the spending limitation for the county fiscal year 2009, such A. 6427 3 1 percentage shall be applied to county personal income for the period 2 January 1, 2006 through December 31, 2006; to determine the spending 3 limitation for the county fiscal year 2010, such percentage shall be 4 applied to county personal income for the period January 1, 2007 through 5 December 31, 2007; to determine the spending limitation for the county 6 fiscal year 2011, such percentage shall be applied to county personal 7 income for the period January 1, 2008 through December 31, 2008; to 8 determine the spending limitation for the county fiscal year 2012, such 9 percentage shall be applied to county personal income for the period 10 January 1, 2009 through December 31, 2009; to determine the spending 11 limitation for the county fiscal year 2013, such percentage shall be 12 applied to county personal income for the period January 1, 2010 through 13 December 31, 2010; to determine the spending limitation for the county 14 fiscal year 2014, such percentage shall be applied to county personal 15 income for the period January 1, 2011 through December 31, 2011; to 16 determine the spending limitation for the county fiscal year 2015, such 17 percentage shall be applied to county personal income for the period 18 January 1, 2012 through December 31, 2012; to determine the spending 19 limitation for county fiscal year 2016, such percentage shall be applied 20 to the county personal income for the period January 1, 2013 through 21 December 31, 2013; to determine the spending limitation for the county 22 fiscal year 2017, such percentage shall be applied to county personal 23 income for the period January 1, 2014 through December 31, 2014; and to 24 determine the spending limitation for county fiscal year 2018, such 25 percentage shall be applied to the county personal income for the period 26 January 1, 2015 through December 31, 2015; to determine the spending 27 limitation for the county fiscal year 2019, such percentage shall be 28 applied to county personal income for the period January 1, 2016 through 29 December 31, 2016; and to determine the spending limitation for county 30 fiscal year 2020, such percentage shall be applied to the county 31 personal income for the period January 1, 2017 through December 31, 32 2017; and to determine the spending limitation for the county fiscal 33 year 2021, such percentage shall be applied to county personal income 34 for the period January 1, 2018 through December 31, 2018; and to deter- 35 mine the spending limitation for the county fiscal year 2022, such 36 percentage shall be applied to county personal income for the period 37 January 1, 2019 through December 31, 2019; and to determine the spending 38 limitation for the county fiscal year 2023, such percentage shall be 39 applied to county personal income for the period January 1, 2020 through 40 December 31, 2020; and to determine the spending limitation for the 41 county fiscal year 2024, such percentage shall be applied to county 42 personal income for the period January 1, 2021 through December 31, 43 2021; and to determine the spending limitation for the county fiscal 44 year 2025, such percentage shall be applied to county personal income 45 for the period January 1, 2022 through December 31, 2022; and to deter- 46 mine the spending limitation for the county fiscal year 2026, such 47 percentage shall be applied to county personal income for the period 48 January 1, 2023 through December 31, 2023; and to determine the spending 49 limitation for the county fiscal year 2027, such percentage shall be 50 applied to county personal income for the period January 1, 2024 through 51 December 31, 2024. 52 b. The spending limitation shall serve as a statutory cap on county 53 spending to be reflected in the tentative budget as well as the enacted 54 budget for county fiscal years beginning in 1992. 55 § 7. Mandatory tax reduction. In the event that the county spending 56 subject to the spending limitation exceeds such limitation in the adop- A. 6427 4 1 tive county budget for county fiscal year 1992, 1993, 1994, 1995, 1996, 2 1997, 1998, 1999, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 4 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024 [or], 2025, 2026 or 2027 then section 1262-b of 5 the tax law shall be repealed. 6 § 16. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however, that 7 sections one through seven of this act shall be in full force and effect 8 until November 30, [2025] 2027. 9 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however that 10 the amendments to sections 4, 5 and 7 of chapter 272 of the laws of 1991 11 made by section two of this act shall not affect the expiration of such 12 sections and shall expire and be deemed repealed therewith.